Utah statutes.
17-36-54.   Tax stability and trust fund -- Use of principal -- Determination of necessity -- Election.

If the legislative body of a county that has established a tax stability and trust fund under Section 17-36-51 determines that it is necessary for purposes of that county to use any portion of the principal of the fund, the county legislative body shall submit this proposition to the electorate of that county in a special election called and held in the manner provided for in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, for the holding of bond elections.  If the proposition is approved at this special election by a majority of the qualified electors of the county voting at the election, then that portion of the principal of the fund covered by the proposition may be transferred to the county's general fund for use for purposes of that county.



Amended by Chapter 105, 2005 General Session

